Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.103.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Dependent" means a person enrolled as a dependent in the defense enrollment eligibility reporting system.

(2) "Eligible student" means a member of the Washington national guard or the spouse or dependent of, and designated by, a member who agrees to fulfill his or her service obligation and meets any additional selection criteria adopted by the office and all of the following participation requirements:

(a) Is enrolled in courses or a program that lead to a postsecondary degree or certificate at an institution of higher education located in the state and accredited by the Northwest Association of Schools and Colleges, or an institution that is located in the state that provides approved training under the Montgomery GI Bill;

(b) Is an active drilling member, or the spouse or dependent of, and designated by, an active drilling member. The member must be in good standing in the Washington national guard as specified in rules adopted by the office for implementation of the grant;

(c) Has completed and submitted an application for student aid approved by the office; and

(d) Is a resident student as defined in RCW 28B.15.012.

(3) "Forgiven" or "to forgive" or "forgiveness" means either to render service in the Washington national guard in lieu of monetary repayment, or to be relieved of the service obligation under rules adopted by the office.

(4) "Grant" means the Washington national guard postsecondary education grant as established in RCW 28B.103.020.

(5) "Maximum benefit" means the maximum grant a Washington national guard member and the guard member's spouse and dependents are eligible to receive.

(6) "Member" means a member of the Washington national guard who has received, or whose spouse or dependent has received, a grant under this chapter.

(7) "Office" means the office of student financial assistance created in RCW 28B.76.090.

(8) "Participant" means an eligible student who has received a grant under this chapter.

(9) "Service obligation" means an obligation by the member to serve in the Washington national guard for a time period of at least one year of service in the Washington national guard for each year the participant receives a grant.

[ 2024 c 178 s 1; 2022 c 68 s 1; 2020 c 297 s 1; 2006 c 71 s 1; 2000 c 159 s 1; 1994 c 234 s 5.]